Wyoming, session 2025, HB0153.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 31-2-201(a)(i), 31-2-204(b),
31-2-206(a) and by creating new subsections (r) through
(u), 31-2-214(a)(intro) and by creating a new subsection
(f) and 31-3-101(g) by creating a new paragraph (vi) are
amended to read:
HB0153

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0459

31-2-201. Registration required; timelines.

(a) Except as provided in W.S. 31-2-224 and
subsection (q) of this section, every owner, or if
applicable, operator or lessee, of a vehicle which will be
operated or driven upon any highway in Wyoming, shall be
required to obtain registration at the following times:

(i) Annually not later than the last day of the
annual registration month unless the vehicle is permanently
registered under W.S. 31-2-206(r) through (u).
Applications may be by mail;

31-2-204. Issuance of certificates of registration
and license plates by county; form.

(b) Except as otherwise provided, license plates
shall be of metal not less than twelve (12) inches long in
the left-hand end of which shall be arabic numerals for the
county in which issued, followed by the bucking horse and
rider emblem and a distinctive number assigned to the
vehicle, set forth in numerals and letters as determined by
HB0153

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0459
the department and above or underneath such numerals shall
be the word "Wyoming" and arabic numerals for the year of
issue or validation. License plates issued to dealers and
for state or federal official forestry vehicles,
motorcycles, multipurpose vehicles, permanently registered
vehicles and trailers shall contain appropriate
identification which may be in lieu of the bucking horse
and rider emblem. After the county number on the left-hand
end, the license plate may also contain a distinctive
symbol or letters, as determined by the department,
indicating vehicle type. License plates shall be changed
or validated annually. There shall be a marked contrast
between the color of the plate and that of the numerals and
letters and the background of all plates shall be fully
reflectorized. Plates for light utility trailers under one
thousand (1,000) pounds, motorcycles and multipurpose
vehicles shall not be less than three (3) inches wide and
six (6) inches long. Antique license plates shall bear no
date and shall bear the inscription "Pioneer Wyo". License
plates for vehicles that are permanently registered shall
bear no date, shall bear the inscription "Permanent" and
the department shall prescribe the design of the permanent
registration license plate. Distinctive license farm
HB0153

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0459
stickers shall be issued by the county treasurer upon
request for trucks and trailers used by any farmer or
rancher for the transportation of livestock, feed or
unprocessed agricultural products owned and produced by the
farmer or rancher from the place of production to market
and of ranch supplies intended solely for the use of the
farmer or rancher, and not for sale, on the return trip,
and not for the transportation of goods and persons for
hire. Farm stickers shall bear the inscription "Farm".

31-2-206. Annual renewal; delivery of license plates
and stickers; staggered registration; permanent vehicle
registration.

(a) Except as otherwise provided vehicle
registrations expire on the last day of the annual
registration month. Renewals are effective for one (1) year
beginning the first day of the month following the annual
registration month. The initial registration for a vehicle
in this state expires on the last day of the annual
registration month in the following year. Except as
provided in subsection (h) and in subsections (n) through
(q) (u) of this section, nothing in this section prohibits
HB0153

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0459
an owner from registering a vehicle for more than twelve
(12) but less than twenty-four (24) months.

(r) The owner of a vehicle required to be registered
under W.S. 31-2-201(a) may permanently register the vehicle
without further renewal upon payment of the fees required
by subsection (s) of this section, provided the vehicle:

(i) Is not a commercial vehicle; and

(ii) Is in its fifteenth year of service or
later.

(s) Upon payment of the fees specified in this
subsection, the department shall issue a distinctive
license plate indicating the permanent registration of a
vehicle qualifying for permanent registration under
subsection (r) of this section. After payment of the fees
under this subsection, the owner of a vehicle qualifying
for permanent registration under subsection (r) of this
section shall not be subject to renewal or the payment of
additional registration fees for as long as the owner owns
the vehicle. The fees for permanent registration shall be:
HB0153

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0459

(i) A permanent registration state
administration fee in the amount of eighty-seven dollars
and fifty cents ($87.50); and

(ii) An amount equal to three (3) times the
applicable fee due under W.S. 31-3-101(a) plus any donation
amounts under W.S. 31-3-101(h) or (j). Any donated amount
shall not be subject to the requirement to pay five (5)
times the applicable amount.

(t) The owner of a vehicle that is permanently
registered under subsection (r) of this section shall
display the permanent registration license plates in
accordance with W.S. 31-2-205 only on the permanently
registered vehicle for which the plate was issued.

(u) The permanent registration of a vehicle under
subsection (r) of this section shall not be transferred to
a new owner. Upon transfer of a vehicle that was
permanently registered under subsection (r) of this section
to a new owner, the new owner shall be subject to all
applicable title, registration and license fees under title
HB0153

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0459
31, chapter 2, articles 1 and 2 and chapter 3 of the
Wyoming statutes.

31-2-214. Transfer of ownership.

(a) Except as provided by subsections (b) through (e)
(f) of this section, upon transfer of ownership of a
vehicle the registration of the vehicle expires and the
original owner shall immediately remove the license plates
from the vehicle. Within sixty (60) days after acquiring
another vehicle for which the license plates would be
proper, the original owner may file an application for the
transfer of the license registration number to a vehicle
acquired by him accompanied by the fees based on the amount
which would be due on a new registration as of the date of
transfer less any credit for the unused portion of the
original registration fees for the original vehicle for the
assignment of the plates to the recently acquired vehicle
subject to the following:

(f) Upon transfer of ownership of a vehicle that was
permanently registered under W.S. 31-2-206(r), the
permanent registration of that vehicle expires and the
HB0153

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0459
original owner shall immediately remove the license plates
from that vehicle and the permanent license plates shall
not be transferred to another vehicle. If the original
owner acquires another vehicle subject to registration fees
under W.S. 31-2-201, the original owner shall not receive
any credit for the previous registration under W.S.
31-2-206(r).

31-3-101. Registration fees; exemptions.

(g) Owners of the following vehicles are exempt from
the payment of fees provided by subsections (a) and (b) of
this section:

(vi) Vehicles permanently registered pursuant to
W.S. 31-2-206(r) through (u).

Section 2. The department of transportation shall
promulgate all rules necessary to implement this act.
HB0153

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0459

Section 3.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of
this section, this act is effective July 1, 2025;

(b) Sections 2 and 3 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
HB0153